Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.125

Collector.

"Collector" means the owner of one or more vehicles described in RCW 46.18.220(1) who collects, purchases, acquires, trades, or disposes of the vehicle or parts of it, for his or her personal use, in order to preserve, restore, and maintain the vehicle for hobby or historical purposes.

[ 2010 c 161 s 108; 1996 c 225 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Intent—Legislation to reconcile chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and other amendments made during the 2010 legislative session—2010 c 161: See notes following RCW 46.04.013.

Finding—1996 c 225: "The legislature finds and declares that constructive leisure pursuits by Washington citizens is most important. This act is intended to encourage responsible participation in the hobby of collecting, preserving, restoring, and maintaining motor vehicles of historic and special interest, which hobby contributes to the enjoyment of the citizens and the preservation of Washington's automotive memorabilia." [ 1996 c 225 s 1.]